apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
<pardef n="сп/ати__vblex_imperf_iv">
  <e>       <p><l>ати</l>       <r>ати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__йд\и_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>атим</l>      <r>ати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__люб\ить_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l>         <r>ати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ляч</l>       <r>ати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>лячи</l>      <r>ати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>авши</l>      <r>ати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="сид/іти__vblex_imperf_iv">
  <e>       <p><l>іти</l>       <r>іти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>іти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__йд\и_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ітим</l>      <r>іти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>іти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__ход\ить_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l>         <r>іти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ячи</l>       <r>іти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>івши</l>      <r>іти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="бі/гти__vblex_imperf_iv">
  <e>       <p><l>гти</l>       <r>гти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ж</l>         <r>гти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__йд\и_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>гтим</l>      <r>гти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ж</l>         <r>гти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач\ить_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>г</l>         <r>гти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__біг_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>жучи</l>      <r>гти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>гши</l>       <r>гти<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="раху/вати__vblex_imperf_tv">
  <e>       <p><l>вати</l>      <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ватим</l>     <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__розмовля\є_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ва</l>        <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ляч</l>       <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l>       <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вавши</l>     <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="раху/вати__vblex_imperf_iv">
  <e>       <p><l>вати</l>      <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ватим</l>     <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__розмовля\є_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ва</l>        <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ляч</l>       <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l>       <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вавши</l>     <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="отриму/вати__vblex_imperf_tv">
  <e>       <p><l>вати</l>      <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>й</l>         <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ватим</l>     <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__розмовля\є_pres"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ва</l>        <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ючи</l>       <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ван</l>       <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вавши</l>     <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>вано</l>      <r>вати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impers"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ка/зати__vblex_imperf_tv">
  <e>       <p><l>зати</l>      <r>зати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ж</l>         <r>зати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__йд\и_imp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>затим</l>     <r>зати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ж</l>         <r>зати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__писатим\е_fut"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>за</l>        <r>зати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бу\в_cni_past"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>жучи</l>      <r>зати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>зан</l>       <r>зати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__англійський"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>завши</l>     <r>зати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>зано</l>      <r>зати<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impers"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!--base paradigms for verbs with -ся (-сь)-->
<pardef n="BASE__ся">  <e>       <p><l>ся</l>        <r></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__сь">  <e>       <p><l>сь</l>        <r></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__ховай\ся_imp">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/><par n="BASE__ся"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="BASE__бач_imp"/><par n="BASE__сь"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__диви\ся_imp">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p><par n="BASE__йд\и_imp"/><par n="BASE__ся"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>імось</l>     <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ись</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="спати">           <i>сп</i><par n="сп/ати__vblex_imperf_iv"/></e>
<e lm="сидіти">          <i>сид</i><par n="сид/іти__vblex_imperf_iv"/></e>
<e lm="рахувати">        <i>раху</i><par n="раху/вати__vblex_imperf_tv"/></e>
<e lm="рахувати">        <i>раху</i><par n="раху/вати__vblex_imperf_iv"/></e>
<e lm="бігти">           <i>бі</i><par n="бі/гти__vblex_imperf_iv"/></e>
<e lm="казати">          <i>ка</i><par n="ка/зати__vblex_imperf_tv"/></e>
<e lm="отримувати">      <i>отриму</i><par n="отриму/вати__vblex_imperf_tv"/></e>
